Tennessee, session 114, SB2110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-303, is amended by adding
the following new subdivision (a)(1)(G) and redesignating the current subdivision and
subsequent subdivisions appropriately:
(G) Section 39-13-527;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to offenses occurring on or after that date.
SB2110
012117
- 1 -